Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-241
School lands; leases; assignments; validity; recording.

An assignment of a school land lease shall not be valid until recorded in the office of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds and shall not be eligible to such record if there are any payments of interest or rental due at the time the assignment is offered for record.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 18, p. 310;

R.S.1913, § 5864;

C.S.1922, § 5200;

Laws 1923, c. 60, § 1, p. 183;

C.S.1929, § 72-220;

Laws 1935, c. 163, § 13, p. 606;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-220;

R.S.1943, § 72-241;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 40.

Assignment of school land lease is not valid until recorded in the office of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds. Kidder v. Wright, 177 Neb. 222, 128 N.W.2d 683 (1964).

Assignments of school land leases are permitted, but to be effective against the state must be recorded. State ex rel. Johnson v. Commercial State Bank, 142 Neb. 752, 7 N.W.2d 654 (1943).